District of Columbia statutes.
47-445

Rules and regulations.

The Chief Financial Officer is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the efficient administration of this subchapter.

July 18, 1981, D.C. Law 4-17, § 6, 28 DCR 2368
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7342(d), 60 DCR 12472
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 7343 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that § 7342 of the act shall apply as for tax years beginning after December 31, 2012.
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 4-17, see Mayor’s Order 86-145, August 25, 1986.
Section 7341 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle HH of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Multistate Tax Compact Enactment and Clarification Act of 2013”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7342(d) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7342(d) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 12(d) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 12(d) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 12(d) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 12(d) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-228, March 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 12(d) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, October 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 substituted “Chief Financial Officer” for “Mayor.”
1981 Ed., § 47-445.